Yamls/N-mu_gt-norm.yaml
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [муэзланьӧттяс, муэзланьӧттис, муэсланьӧт, муэзысланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [муэзланьӧдззаc, муэзланьӧдззиc, муэсланьӧдз, муэзысланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: муэсланьви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: муэзным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: муэзнымлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: муэзнымлісь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: муэзнымлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: муэзнымӧс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: муэзнаным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxPl1: муэзнымкӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [муэзнымтӧг, муэзтӧгьяным]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: муэзнымла
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: муэзнымся
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: муэзаным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [муэзсиным, муэсиным]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: муэзаным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [муэзнымлань, муэзланяным]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [муэзнымсянь, муэзсяняным]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [муэзӧттяным, муэзӧттиным]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [муэзӧдззаным, муэзӧдззиным]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: муэзнымви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: муэзланяным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: муэзланьсиным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: муэзланяным
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [муэзланьсяняным, муэзнымланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [муэзланьӧттяным, муэзланьӧттиным, муэзнымланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [муэзланьӧдззаным, муэзланьӧдззиным, муэзнымланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: муэзнымланьви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: муэзныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: муэзнытлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: муэзнытлісь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: муэзнытлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: муэзнытӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: муэзнаныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxPl2: муэзныткӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [муэзныттӧг, муэзтӧгьяныт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: муэзнытла
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: муэзнытся
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: муэзаныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [муэзсиныт, муэсиныт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: муэзаныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [муэзнытлань, муэзланяныт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [муэзнытсянь, муэзсяняныт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [муэзӧттяныт, муэзӧттиныт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [муэзӧдззаныт, муэзӧдззиныт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: муэзнытви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: муэзланяныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: муэзланьсиныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: муэзланяныт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [муэзланьсяняныт, муэзнытланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [муэзланьӧттяныт, муэзланьӧттиныт, муэзнытланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [муэзланьӧдззаныт, муэзланьӧдззиныт, муэзнытланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: муэзнытланьви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: муэзныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: муэзныслӧн
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: муэзныслісь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: муэзныслӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: муэзнысӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: муэзнаныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxPl3: муэзныскӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [муэзныстӧг, муэзтӧгьяныс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: муэзнысла
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: муэзнысся
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: муэзаныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [муэзсиныс, муэсиныс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: муэзаныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [муэзныслань, муэзланяныс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [муэзныссянь, муэзсяняныс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [муэзӧттяныс, муэзӧттиныс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [муэзӧдззаныс, муэзӧдззиныс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: муэзнысви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: муэзланяныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: муэзланьсиныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: муэзланяныс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [муэзланьсяняныс, муэзнысланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [муэзланьӧттяныс, муэзланьӧттиныс, муэзнысланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [муэзланьӧдззаныс, муэзланьӧдззиныс, муэзнысланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: муэзнысланьви
